Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.022

Actions by the commission against a license—Written notice—Adjudicative proceedings—Surrender.

This section governs the denial of an application for a license or the suspension, revocation, or modification of a license issued by the commission. This section does not govern actions taken under chapter 18.130 RCW.

(1) The commission shall give written notice of the denial of an application for a license to the applicant or its agent. The form, contents, and service of the notice shall comply with this chapter and the procedural rules adopted by the commission.

(2) The commission shall give written notice of revocation, suspension, or modification of a license to the licensee or its agent. The form, contents, and service of the notice shall comply with this chapter and the procedural rules adopted by the commission.

(3) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, revocation, suspension, or modification is effective 28 days after the licensee or the agent receives the notice.

(a) The commission may make the date the action is effective later than 28 days after receipt. If the commission does so, it shall state the effective date in the written notice given to the licensee or its agent.

(b) The commission may make the date the action is effective sooner than 28 days after receipt when necessary to protect the public health, safety, or welfare. When the commission does so, it shall state the effective date and the reasons supporting the effective date in the written notice given to the licensee or its agent.

(4) Except for licensees suspended for noncompliance with a child support order under chapter 74.20A RCW, a license applicant or licensee who is aggrieved by a commission denial, revocation, suspension, or modification has the right to an adjudicative proceeding. The proceeding is governed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW. The form, contents, and service of the application for an adjudicative hearing must comply with this chapter and with the procedural rules adopted by the commission and must be served on and received by the commission within 28 days of the applicant or licensee receiving the notice.

(5)(a) If the commission gives a licensee 28 or more days' notice of revocation, suspension, or modification and the licensee files an appeal before its effective date, the commission shall not implement the adverse action until the final order has been entered. The commission may implement part or all of the adverse action while the proceedings are pending if the appellant causes an unreasonable delay in the proceeding, if the circumstances change so that implementation is in the public interest, or for other good cause.

(b) If the commission gives a licensee less than 28 days' notice of revocation, suspension, or modification and the licensee timely files a sufficient appeal, the commission may implement the adverse action on the effective date stated in the notice. The commission may stay implementation of part or all of the adverse action while the proceedings are pending if staying implementation is in the public interest or for other good cause.

(6) The commission may accept the surrender of the licensee's license. A licensee whose surrender has been accepted may not petition for reinstatement of its surrendered license.

[ 2024 c 121 s 31.]